Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-907
Emergency services; enumerated.

The department shall provide emergency services which shall consist of up to seventy-two hours of crisis intervention services including:

(1) Constant access and intake to services;

(2) Immediate transportation from a victim's home or other location to a hospital or a place of safety;

(3) Immediate medical services or first aid;

(4) Emergency legal counseling and referral;

(5) Crisis counseling to provide support and assurance of safety;

(6) Emergency financial aid; and

(7) Safe living environments that will provide a supportive, nonthreatening shelter to victims, their families, and household members.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 7.